Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.810

Applied baccalaureate degree programs.

(1) The college board may select community or technical colleges to develop and offer programs of study leading to applied baccalaureate degrees. Colleges may submit applications to the college board. The college board shall review the applications and select the colleges using objective criteria, including, but not limited to:

(a) The college demonstrates the capacity to make a long-term commitment of resources to build and sustain a high quality program;

(b) The college has or can readily engage faculty appropriately qualified to develop and deliver a high quality curriculum at the baccalaureate level;

(c) The college can demonstrate demand for the proposed program from a sufficient number of students within its service area to make the program cost-effective and feasible to operate;

(d) The college can demonstrate that employers demand the level of technical training proposed within the program, making it cost-effective for students to seek the degree; and

(e) The proposed program fills a gap in options available for students because it is not offered by a public four-year institution of higher education in the college's geographic area.

(2) A college selected under this section may develop the curriculum for and design and deliver courses leading to an applied baccalaureate degree. However, degree programs developed under this section are subject to approval by the college board under RCW 28B.50.090.

[ 2012 c 229 s 816; 2010 c 245 s 3; 2008 c 166 s 2; 2005 c 258 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Expand on demand—System design plan endorsed—2010 c 245: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.

Findings—Intent—2008 c 166: "The legislature finds that the six colleges that developed proposals for the applied baccalaureate degree pilot programs exhibited exemplary work preparing proposals. The proposals were consistent with the legislature's vision for expanding bachelor's degree access and with the principals and criteria developed by the college board. The legislature recognizes that the authorization for the pilots was limited in number and therefore not all the proposals were able to be approved. The legislature values the work that has been done and intends to provide authority for additional pilots so as not to lose the good work that has been done." [ 2008 c 166 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—2005 c 258: See note following RCW 28B.45.014.